Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 2
COURT-APPOINTED SPECIAL ADVOCATE PROGRAM

Law reviews:
For article "

C
ASA--A Powerful Voice for a

C
hild", see 36 Colo. Law. 97 (Oct. 2007).

19-1-201. Legislative intent.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that quality representation for children requires legal expertise and thorough case monitoring.

The work of community volunteers has been proven to be effective in addressing the needs of children. Partnerships between guardians ad litem and community volunteers can enhance the quality of representation for children.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the state should promote volunteerism and the exercise of responsible citizenship to enable members of local communities to become advocates for children.

Therefore, the general assembly hereby authorizes the creation of volunteer court-appointed special advocate (CASA) programs in order to enhance the quality of representation of children.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1090, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2003:
(2) amended, p. 754, § 5, effective March 25.

19-1-202. Creation of CASA programs.

CASA programs may be established in each judicial district or any two or more judicial districts and shall operate pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between the chief judge of the judicial district and the CASA program. The memorandum of understanding
must identify the roles and responsibilities of any CASA volunteer appointed in the judicial district or districts and must indicate whether any CASA volunteer may be made a party to the action. The memorandum of understanding
may be amended or modified at any time to add or delete roles and responsibilities pursuant to this part 2.

A CASA program established pursuant to the provisions of this part 2 must:

Be a community organization that screens, trains, and supervises CASA volunteers to advocate for the best interests of children in actions brought pursuant to this title and titles 14 and 15, C.R.S., or for a child in a truancy proceeding pursuant to
the "School Attendance Law of 1963", part 1 of article 33 of title 22, C.R.S.;

Be a member in good standing of the Colorado CASA association and the national CASA association and adhere to the guidelines established by those associations;

Appoint a program director who shall have the responsibilities set forth in section 19-1-203;

Have adequate supervisory and support staff who shall be easily accessible, hold regular case conferences with CASA volunteers to review case progress, and conduct annual performance reviews for all CASA volunteers;

Provide staff and CASA volunteers with written program policies, practices, and procedures;

Provide the training required pursuant to section 19-1-204; and

Attempt to maintain a CASA volunteer-to-supervisor ratio of thirty-to-one.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1090, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2008:
(1) amended, p. 30, § 1, effective March 13.

L. 2015:
(1), IP(2), and (2)(a) amended, (SB 15-004), ch. 254, p. 925, § 1, effective August 5.

19-1-203. Program director.

The program director shall be responsible for the administration of the CASA program, including recruitment, selection, training, and supervision and evaluation of staff and CASA volunteers.

The program director shall serve as a professional liaison between the court and community agencies serving children.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1091, § 4, effective May 23.

19-1-204. Training requirements.

All CASA volunteers shall participate fully in preservice training, including instruction on recognizing child abuse and neglect, cultural awareness, child development, education standards, the juvenile court process, permanency planning, volunteer roles
and responsibilities, advocacy, information gathering, and documentation. CASA volunteers shall be required to participate in observation of court proceedings prior to appointment.

All CASA volunteers shall receive a training manual that shall include guidelines for their service and duties.

Each CASA program shall provide a minimum of ten hours of in-service training per year to CASA volunteers.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1091, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2015:
(1) amended, (SB 15-004), ch. 254, p. 926, § 2, effective August 5.

19-1-205. Selection of CASA volunteers.

Each CASA program shall adopt regulations consistent with subsection (2) of this section and with the Colorado CASA association and national CASA association guidelines governing qualifications and selection of CASA volunteers. Each CASA program's regulations
shall include provisions that qualified adults shall not be discriminated against based on gender, socioeconomic, religious, racial, ethnic, or age factors.

The minimum qualifications for any prospective CASA volunteer are that he or she shall:

Be at least twenty-one years of age or older and have demonstrated an interest in children and their welfare;

Be willing to commit to the court for a minimum of one year of service to a child;

Complete an application, including providing background information required pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;

Participate in a screening interview;

Participate in the training required pursuant to section 19-1-204; and

Meet other qualifications as determined by the CASA program director and the chief judge of the judicial district.

A prospective CASA volunteer's application shall include:

A copy of any criminal history record and motor vehicle record;

Written authorization for the CASA program to obtain information contained in any records or reports of child abuse or neglect concerning the prospective CASA volunteer;

At least three references who can address his or her character, judgment, and suitability for the position; and

Records from any other jurisdictions in which he or she resided during the one-year time period prior to the date of the application if the prospective CASA volunteer has resided in the state of Colorado for less than twelve months.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1091, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2003:
(3)(a) amended and (3)(a.5) added, p. 1401, § 7, effective January 1, 2004.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending subsection (3)(a) and enacting subsection (3)(a.5), see section 1 of chapter 196, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

19-1-206. Appointment of CASA volunteers.

A judge or magistrate may appoint a CASA volunteer in any action brought pursuant to this title and titles 14 and 15, C.R.S., when, in the opinion of the judge or magistrate, a child who may be affected by such action requires services that a CASA volunteer
can provide. At the discretion of the judge or magistrate, a CASA volunteer may be a party to the action if so provided for in the memorandum of understanding.

A judge or magistrate may appoint a CASA volunteer in any action brought in a proceeding pursuant to the "School Attendance Law of 1963", part 1 of article 33 of title 22, C.R.S., provided that at least one parent or legal guardian of the child involved
is provided with notice of the appointment of a CASA volunteer.

A CASA volunteer shall be appointed at the earliest stages of an action pursuant to a court order that gives him or her the authority to review all relevant documents and interview all parties involved in the case, including parents, other parties in
interest, and any other persons having significant information relating to the child.

The CASA volunteer's appointment concludes:

When the court's jurisdiction over the child terminates; or

Upon discharge by the court on its own motion or at the request of the program director of the CASA program to which the CASA volunteer is assigned.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1092, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2015:
(1) and IP(3) amended, (SB 15-004), ch. 254, p. 926, § 3, effective August 5.

19-1-207. Restrictions.

A CASA volunteer shall not:

Accept any compensation for the duties and responsibilities of his or her appointment;

Have any association that creates a conflict of interest with his or her duties;

Be related to any party or attorney involved in a case;

Be employed in a position that could result in a conflict of interest or give rise to the appearance of a conflict;

Use the CASA volunteer position to seek or accept gifts or special privileges.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1093, § 4, effective May 23.

19-1-208. Duties of CASA volunteer.

Independent case investigation. Upon appointment in an action, a CASA volunteer may:

Conduct an independent investigation regarding the best interests of the child that will provide factual information to the court regarding the child and the child's family. The investigation shall include interviews with and observations of the child,
interviews with other appropriate individuals, and the review of relevant records and reports.

Determine if an appropriate treatment plan, as described in section 19-1-103, has been created for the child, whether appropriate services are being provided to the child and family, and whether the treatment plan is progressing in a timely manner;

Determine if additional services are necessary to ensure educational success for a child in a proceeding pursuant to the "School Attendance Law of 1963", part 1 of article 33 of title 22, C.R.S.

Recommendations. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the CASA volunteer, with the support and supervision of the CASA program staff, shall make recommendations consistent with the best interests of the child regarding placement, visitation, and appropriate
services for the child and family and shall prepare a written report to be distributed to the parties of the action.

Reports. The CASA volunteer shall assure that the child's best interests are being advocated at every stage of the case and prepare written reports to be distributed to the parties of the action.

Case monitoring. The CASA volunteer shall monitor the case to which he or she has been appointed to assure that the child's essential needs are being met and that the terms of the court's orders have been fulfilled in an appropriate and timely manner.

Witness. The CASA volunteer may be called as a witness in an action by any party or the court and may request of the court the opportunity to appear as a witness.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1093, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 98:
(1)(b) amended, p. 821, § 24, effective August 5.

L. 2015:
(1)(c) added, (SB 15-004), ch. 254, p. 926, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2021:
IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 729, § 68, effective October 1.

19-1-209. Role and responsibilities of guardians ad litem - other parties.

Any guardian ad litem, and all state and local agencies, departments, authorities, and institutions shall cooperate and share information with any CASA volunteer appointed to serve on a case and with each local CASA program to facilitate the implementation
of its program.

The CASA program will help facilitate the cooperation and sharing of information among CASA volunteers, the attorneys, the county department of human or social services, and other community agencies.

In any case in which the court has appointed both a CASA volunteer and a guardian ad litem, the CASA volunteer and the guardian ad litem shall cooperate to represent the best interests of the child.

The CASA volunteer shall be notified of hearings, staffings, meetings, and any other proceedings concerning the case to which he or she has been appointed.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1094, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2018:
(1)(b) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 410, § 35, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-1-210. Access to information.

Upon appointment of a CASA volunteer, the court shall issue an order authorizing access to such records and other information relating to the child, parent, legal guardian, or other parties in interest as the court deems necessary.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1094, § 4, effective May 23.

19-1-211. Confidentiality.

A CASA volunteer shall not disclose the contents of any document, record, or other information relating to a case to which the CASA volunteer has access in the course of an investigation. All such information shall be considered confidential and shall
not be disclosed to persons other than the court and parties to the action.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1094, § 4, effective May 23.

19-1-212. Liability.

CASA program directors and volunteers participating in a CASA program shall have the same civil immunity and liability as described in sections 13-21-115.5 and 13-21-115.7, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added, p. 1094, § 4, effective May 23.

19-1-213. State CASA entity - duties - state court administrator duties - state court-appointed special advocate fund - definitions.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Local CASA program" means a CASA program established in a judicial district, or any two or more judicial districts, pursuant to section 19-1-202.

"Office of the child's representative" means the office of the child's representative created in section 13-91-104.

"State CASA entity" means the nonprofit entity that has entered into a contract with the office of the child's representative as described in subsection (2) of this section.

The office of the child's representative shall contract with a nonprofit entity that is in good standing with the national CASA association to enhance the CASA program in Colorado. The state CASA entity shall:

Aid and develop local CASA programs in each judicial district or in adjacent judicial districts;

Ensure that local CASA programs adhere to state and national CASA standards;

Ensure the provision and availability of high-quality accessible training for local CASA programs and volunteers;

Seek to enhance existing funding sources, develop private-public partnership funding, and study the availability of new funding sources for the provision of high-quality local CASA programs in each judicial district or in adjacent judicial districts.

Beginning July 1, 2019, and at least annually thereafter, the office of the child's representative shall allocate money appropriated to the state judicial department for CASA programs to the state CASA entity for allocation to local CASA programs. The
state CASA entity shall report to the office of the child's representative regarding its duties described in subsection (2) of this section within one month before receiving an allocation.

The state CASA entity, in consultation with local CASA programs, shall annually establish a formula for the allocation of money appropriated and shall allocate money to the local CASA programs in accordance with the established allocation formula. The
allocation formula must be provided to the office of the child's representative no later than June 15, 2019, and each June 15 thereafter, prior to the state CASA entity receiving its annual allocation. On a schedule described in
the contract, but at least annually, the state CASA entity shall provide to the office of the child's representative a certification from each local CASA program of the amount that program received from each allocation since the
prior certification.

On or before November 1, 2020, and on or before November 1 each year thereafter, the state CASA entity shall report its activities and the activities of each local CASA program to the office of the child's representative.

The state court-appointed special advocate fund, referred to in this subsection (6) as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section and any other money
that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. The money in the fund
is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state judicial department for the purposes of funding local CASA programs established in each judicial district, or in adjacent judicial districts, pursuant
to this part 2, and the enhancement of local CASA programs. Any money not appropriated remains in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year.

The office of the child's representative may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources to fund the work of the state CASA entity. The office of the child's representative shall transmit all money received through
gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the fund.

Source:

L. 2019:
Entire section added, (HB 19-1282), ch. 312, p. 2813, § 1, effective May 28.